Washington statutes.
RCW 11.106.020

Trustee's annual statement.

The trustee or trustees appointed by any will, deed, or agreement executed must mail or deliver at least annually to each permissible distributee, as defined in RCW 11.98.002, a written itemized statement of all current receipts and disbursements made by the trustee of the funds of the trust both principal and income, and upon the request of any such beneficiary must furnish the beneficiary an itemized statement of all property then held by that trustee, and may also file any such statement in the superior court of the county in which the trustee or one of the trustees resides.

[ 2013 c 272 s 26; 1985 c 30 s 96. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 129; 1955 c 33 s 30.30.020; prior: 1951 c 226 s 2. Formerly RCW 30.30.020.]

NOTES:

Application—2013 c 272: See note following RCW 11.98.002.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.

Trust provisions may relieve trustee from duty, restriction, or liability imposed by statute: RCW 11.97.010.